Utah statutes.
26-25-4.   Information held in confidence -- Protection of identities.

(1)  All information described in Subsection 26-25-1(1) that is provided to a person or organization described in Subsection 26-25-1(2) shall be held in strict confidence by that person or organization, and any use, release, or publication resulting therefrom shall be made only for the purposes described in Subsection 26-25-1(3) and Section 26-25-2 and shall preclude identification of any individual or individuals studied.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the department's use and disclosure of information is not governed by this chapter.

